apertium-sme-sma.sma.twol
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                   South Sámi morphophonological rule set                   !
! ========================================================================== !

! twol-sma.txt
! The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
! South Sámi morphophonological rules

! m4 rules for selecting parts of the file for certain applications.







! HYPHENATE = To be used when making hyphenators - it allows surfacing of # and ^
! DESCRIPTIVE = Variants or sections used for the non-normative grammar

Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
  A B C D E F G H I Ï J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
  á é í 
  Å Ä Ö Ø Æ Á
  Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð Ŋ Ŧ Č Ž     
  á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð đ ß ª ß ç ŋ ŧ č ž 

  ':0 !'

! Border symbols:
! # = word boundary
! > = stem-inflection boundary
! » = derivation boundary
! + = metric foot boundary (is it used any more?)
! ^ = explicit hyphenation point
 %^:0

 %#:0


 %>:0 %+:0 »:0  ! stem-suffix border mark, unvisible for normal use


! Triggers:
  X2:0
  X3:0
  X4:0
  %^DISIMP:0
  %^COMPDISIMP:0
  %^COMPDISIMP2:0
  %^NOMAGieDISIMP:0
  %^1UML:0 %^2UML:0
  %^3UML:0
  %^3sUML:0
  %^3dUML:0
  %^iæUML:0
  %^iUML:0
  %^PASSUML:0
  %^didhUML:0
  %^adteUML:0
  %^htjidhUML:0
  %^aLATUS:a
  %^uLATUS:e ;

Sets
  Letter = a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
           A B C D E F G H I Ï J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ä Æ Ä Æ Å ;
  Cns    =   b c d   f g h     j k l m n   p q r s t   v w x   z           
             B C D   F G H     J K L M N   P Q R S T   V W X   Z           ;

  CJV    =   b c d   f g h       k l m n   p q r s t     w x   z           
             B C D   F G H     J K L M N   P Q R S T   V W X   Z           ;
  Vow    = a       e       i ï           o           u       y   æ ä ø ö å 
           A       E       I Ï           O           U       Y   Ä Æ Ä Æ Å ;
  DobCons = s m ;
!  Bound   = # %> ;
!  WordBound = # ;
  DomainBound = # %+ ;

Definitions

  Triggers =
    %^DISIMP:
    %^COMPDISIMP:
    %^COMPDISIMP2:
    %^NOMAGieDISIMP:0
    %^1UML:
    %^2UML:
    %^3UML:
    %^3sUML:
    %^3dUML:
    %^iæUML:
    %^PASSUML:
    %^didhUML:
    %^adteUML:
    %^htjidhUML:
    %^aLATUS:
    %^uLATUS: ;

Rules
 
  "e deletion before i-initial suffix"
   e:0 <=> _ X2:0 i: ;

!€# manneX2ine
!€0 mann00ine

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Odd-syllabic verbs and nouns: !!!

  "Diphthong simplification ie:e"
   i:0 <=>       _ e  Cns+ (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ;
                 _ e           (%>:) %^DISIMP:      Cns+   ;
                 _ e           (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:] ;
           (%»:) _ e: Cns+      %»:  %^adteUML: ;


!€# dåeried%>%^DISIMPem
!€0 dåer0ed00em

!$# dåeried%>%^DISIMPem
!$0 dåeried00em

!€# gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm
!€0 gier0ehtse00m

!$# gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm
!$0 gieriehtse00m

!€# gijmie%>%^DISIMPbe
!€0 gijm0e00be

!$# gijmie%>%^DISIMPbe
!$0 gijmie00be


  "Diphthong simplification oe:o"
   e:0 <=> o _  Cns+ (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ;
           o _           (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP2: [b:|m:] ;


!€# daaroest%>%^DISIMPem
!€0 daaro0st00em

!$# daaroest%>%^DISIMPem
!$0 daaroest00em

!€# gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm
!€0 gaalo0hke00m

!$# gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm
!$0 gaaloehke00m


  "Diphthong simplification oe:e" !in comparatives
   o:0 <=>       _ e     (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:] ;
           (%»:) _ e Cns+ %»:  %^adteUML: ;


!€# jearkoe%>%^DISIMPbe
!€0 jeark0e00be

!$# jearkoe%>%^DISIMPbe
!$0 jearkoe00be


  "a/e alternation"
   a:e <=>         _ [ Cns - j | %»: t j | h t ] (Cns) (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ;
                   _                                   (%>:)     %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:] ;
           [e:|u:] _   Cns+      %»:                             %^didhUML: e d ;
           !Last context above: Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 4 ea:ïe
           ! and Column 7 ua:oe part 2

!€# aatskad%>%^DISIMPem
!€0 aatsked00em

!$# aatskad%>%^DISIMPem
!$0 aatskad00em

!€# daktare%>%^DISIMPm
!€0 daktere00m

!$# daktare%>%^DISIMPm
!$0 daktare00m


!€# gæhtja%>%^DISIMPbe
!€0 gæhtje00be

!$# gæhtja%>%^DISIMPbe
!$0 gæhtja00be


  "a/i alternation"
   a:i <=> _ j (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ;

! No nouns following this pattern, see last part of §103 in Bergsland - ???

!€# jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em
!€0 jåhtij00em

!$# jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em
!$0 jåhtaj00em


  "Even syllabic verbs Du1Pl3 e/oe V"
  ':o <=> _ e: X2: Cns ;
  
  "Even syllabic verbs Du3 e/i alternation V"
  e:0 <=>      ': _             X3:               Cns ;
          (%»:) i _ j (e) (%>:) %^NOMAGieDISIMP: ([h|m|n|i|i g u j m i e]) ;
  
  "Even syllabic verbs Du2Pl12 e/i V"
  e:i <=> ': _ X4: j i [d|b] i e (n) ;
  
!€# vååjn'eX4jibie
!€0 vååjn0i0jibie

!$# vååjn'eX4jibie
!$0 vååjn0e0jibie

  
!€# juht%»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm
!€0 juht0i0je00m

!$# juht%»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm
!$0 juht0ieje00m

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! New style Umlaut rules. !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!Class Even I

! i:æ e:a ae:aa u:å 
! Pres Sg123
! V28, V30, V32, V36, V38, V40
! N §102

"Even syllabic verbs present sg, monophpt E I"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | Cns+ ](%»:) _ Cns+ [
                                  [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] |
                                             %^aLATUS: %»:                ] |
                                  [ ([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0                  ] |
                                  [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                ] ;
 	where Vx in (i e u)
 	      Vy in (æ a å)
 	matched ;
 
!THOM 2009-03-04: added #: in front of Cns+ in left-hand context because rule overgenerated to 3-syllable verbs, so we got goltelidh > goltalahtjedh. The change aimed to restrict the context to 2-syllable stems.
!THOM 2009-10-22: removed the #: in front of Cns+ in left-hand context beacause we got wrong analyze:vuesiehtimman instead of vuesiehtæmman. It does not seem to overgenerate to 3-syllable verbs anymore, so I leave it like this for now. 
! klihtie -> klæhtetje
!€# kliht%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
!€0 klæhte0tje00

! klæhtatjasse
!€# kliht%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!€0 klæhta0tj0asse

! jeptsie -> japtsetje
!€# jepts%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
!€0 japtse0tje00

! japtsatjasse
!€# jepts%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!€0 japtsa0tj0asse

! gullie -> gålletje
!€# gull%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
!€0 gålle0tje00

! gållatjasse
!€# gull%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!€0 gålla0tj0asse

!€# biss%>%^1UMLam
!€0 bæss00am

!€# belt%>%^1UMLam
!€0 balt00am

!€# buhtj%>%^1UMLa
!€0 båhtj00a

!€# paek%>%^1UMLa
!€0 paak00a

!€# bået%>%^1UMLa
!€0 båat00a

!€# buel%>%^1UMLa
!€0 bual00a

!€# kliht%>%^1UMLan
!€0 klæht00an

!€# jepts%>%^1UMLan
!€0 japts00an

!€# gull%>%^1UMLan
!€0 gåll00an

!€# gaevl%>%^1UMLan
!€0 gaavl00an

!€# gået%>%^1UMLan
!€0 gåat00an

!€# njuesl%>%^1UMLan
!€0 njuasl00an



"Even syllabic verbs present sg, diphth ie-ea part 1" 
 i:e <=> [ #: | Cns+ ] _ e: Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] |
                                              %^aLATUS: %»:               ] |
                                   [([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0                  ] |
                                   [(     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                 ] ;
		Cns _ j %>: %^DISIMP: [e(m)|h|i|e n|e m i n i e] #: ;
		!Last context above: verbs ending -ijidh: Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2,
		! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prt+Sg3, +ConNeg, +Imprt+Sg2, +Ger, +VGen

!€# jieht%>%^1UMLa
!€0 jeaht00a

!$# jieht%>%^1UMLa
!$0 jieht00a

!€# sjiell%>%^1UMLan
!€0 sjeall00an


     ! gåetie -> gåatetje
     !€# gået%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
     !€0 gåate0tje00

! [Cns|#:] constraint is to avoid collission with diphthong contexts
"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc E II"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | #: ] _ Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ;
 	where Vx in (æ a å)
 	      Vy in (y o o)
 	matched ;

!€# gælj%>%^2UMLe
!€0 gylj00e

!€# færhtje%>%^2UMLse
!€0 fyrhtje00se

!€# hahtje%>%^2UMLse
!€0 hohtje00se

!€# rånhtje%>%^2UMLse
!€0 ronhtje00se

!$# færhtje%>%^2UMLse
!$0 færhtje00se

!$# hahtje%>%^2UMLse
!$0 hahtje00se

!$# rånhtje%>%^2UMLse
!$0 rånhtje00se

!! "o Deletion verbs Sg3 - PrfPtc II"
!! o:0 <=> %>: %^2UML: _ e  ;
!! !
!! !"e Deletion" 	
!! !e:0 <=> o _ (Dummy:) %>: [b|d]; ! Dummy being %^2UML



"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ea-yö II a"
 e:y <=>                  _ a: Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ]               %^2UML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ a: Cns+              (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;


"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ea-yö II b"
 a:ö <=>                  e: _ Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ]               %^2UML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] e: _ Cns+              (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;

!€# tjear%>%^2UMLe
!€0 tjyör00e

!$# tjear%>%^2UMLe
!$0 tjear00e

!€# bearke%>%^2UMLse
!€0 byörke00se

!$# bearko%>%^2UMLse
!$0 bearke00se

!€# mearhtje%>%^2UMLse
!€0 myörhtje00se

!$# mearhtje%>%^2UMLse
!$0 mearhtje00se

"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc aa-åå åa-åå II"
 a:å <=> [a:|å:] _    Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ; 
                 _ a: Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ; 

!aa åa
!åå åå

!€# haare%>%^2UMLse
!€0 hååre00se

!$# haare%>%^2UMLse
!$0 haare00se

!€# råafe%>%^2UMLse
!€0 rååfe00se

!$# råafe%>%^2UMLse
!$0 råafe00se


"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 ï-æ IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
 	where Vx in (ï o)
 	      Vy in (æ å)
 	matched ;

! Verbs like: mïnnedh, jovkedh

!€# mïnn%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 mænn00a

!€# jovk%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 jåvk00a

"1st rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | #: ] _ e: Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
	where Vx in (ï o)
	      Vy in (e u)
	matched ;

"2nd rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV"
 e:a <=>              [ï:|o:] _ Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
         [ #: | Cns+ ] i:     _ Cns+ [
                                         [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                         [ ([%>:|%»:])                %^1UML:0    ] |
                                         [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML:  ]
                                      ] ; !Even syllabic verbs present sg, diphth ie-ea part 2
         [ #: | Cns+ ] [å|a|u] _ Cns+ [
                                         [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                         [ ([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0 ]|
                                         [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                      ] ; !Even syllabic verbs present sg, diphth ae-aa, åe-åa, ue-ua
         [#: | #: Cns+]([å|a]) _ Cns+ %»: %^htjidhUML: e h t j ;
         (%»:)         i:      _ Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;


! Verbs like: tjïeledh, roehtedh

!€# tjïel%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 tjeal00a

!€# roeht%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 ruaht00a


"Even syllabic verbs Du1Pl3 IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ] [å|a] _     Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3dUML: ;
           [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ]       _ (e) Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3dUML: ;           
	where Vx in (ï a o)
	      Vy in (i e u)
	matched ;
	
!€# mïnn%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 minn00ien

!€# bark%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 berk00ien

!€# jovk%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 juvk00ien


!€# tjïek%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 tjiek00ien




! prob delete this after testing
! " verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ÅÅ II"
!  a:å <=> _ a:å Cns+ o:0 e: %^2UML: ;
